Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-8701
Act, how cited.

Sections 71-8701 to 71-8722 shall be known and may be cited as the Patient Safety Improvement Act.

Laws 2005, LB 361, § 1;

Laws 2019, LB25, § 2.